Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 3 Membership

47-24-40.
Eligibility.

All persons who are members of the Georgia National Guard on July 1, 2002, shall become members of the fund as of such date. All other persons shall become members of the fund on first becoming a member of the Georgia National Guard.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-24-40

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 1153, § 1.